Indiana, session 2026, SB127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-1-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), before a landlord may sell a residential rental
property that is subject to an unexpired written lease, the landlord
must give to the tenant, not less than sixty (60) days before the
landlord lists the property for sale, written notice of the landlord's
intent to sell the residential real property.
(b) A landlord of residential rental property is not required to
comply with subsection (a) if any of the following apply:
(1) The landlord and tenant mutually agree to terminate the
unexpired lease early.
(2) An unexpired written lease is set to expire within the sixty
(60) day notice period described in subsection (a).
(3) The tenant is in breach of the lease agreement.
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(4) The residential rental property is being sold due to the
death of the owner of the residential rental property.
(5) The residential rental property contains more than four
(4) dwelling units and is used for multifamily residential
housing.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), a buyer of a residential
rental property shall honor an unexpired written lease between the
previous owner and a tenant.
(d) A buyer of a residential rental property may terminate an
unexpired written lease between the previous owner and a tenant
if the buyer:
(1) not less than thirty (30) days before the lease is terminated,
gives written notice to the tenant that the buyer intends to
terminate the lease; and
(2) pays the tenant an amount equal to:
(A) the amount of one (1) monthly rental payment, as
specified in the written lease; plus
(B) the amount of the full security deposit, as specified in
the written lease.
SECTION 2. IC 32-31-8-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this
section, "essential services" means:
(1) electricity;
(2) gas;
(3) heat;
(4) water; or
(5) other services;
needed for the safe and habitable occupation by a tenant of the
tenant's rental unit.
(b) As used in this section, "essential system" means a system,
or one (1) or more parts or components of a system, that:
(1) is described in subsection (c)(4); and
(2) is:
(A) used for; or
(B) necessary to;
the delivery of one (1) or more essential services to a rental
unit.
(c) A landlord shall do the following:
(1) Deliver the rental premises to a tenant in compliance with the
rental agreement, and in a safe, clean, and habitable condition.
(2) Comply with all health and housing codes applicable to the
rental premises.
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(3) Make all reasonable efforts to keep common areas of a rental
premises in a clean and proper condition.
(4) Provide and maintain the following items in a rental premises
in good and safe working condition, if provided on the premises
at the time the rental agreement is entered into:
(A) Electrical systems.
(B) Plumbing systems sufficient to accommodate a reasonable
supply of hot and cold running water at all times.
(C) Sanitary systems.
(D) Heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems. A
heating system must be sufficient to adequately supply heat at
all times.
(E) Elevators, if provided.
(F) Appliances supplied as an inducement to the rental
agreement.
(5) Pay all penalties or fines imposed by a political subdivision
for violation of an obligation under this section with regard to
a rental premises. A landlord may not deliver rental premises
to a tenant until all penalties or fines are paid and all repairs
required by the political subdivision are completed.
(d) Subject to subsections (e) and (f), a landlord shall repair or
replace an essential system not later than forty-eight (48) hours
after being notified by a tenant that the tenant's rental unit is
without one (1) or more essential services as a result of:
(1) a malfunction in the essential system; or
(2) the landlord's failure to otherwise maintain the essential
system in good and safe working condition.
(e) The forty-eight (48) hour period set forth in subsection (d)
does not apply if:
(1) the tenant's rental unit is without one (1) or more essential
services:
(A) because of a malfunction in an essential system; and
(B) the malfunction is the direct result of the tenant's
commission of waste to the essential system or the rental
unit; or
(2) the landlord makes a good faith attempt within the
forty-eight (48) hour period set forth in subsection (d) to
undertake the needed repairs to, or replacement of, an
essential system through:
(A) the landlord's own efforts; or
(B) the services of:
(i) a contractor; or
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(ii) an employee or agent of the landlord;
and the landlord or person described in clause (B) is unable to
begin or complete the needed repairs or replacement within
the forty-eight (48) hour period set forth in subsection (d).
(f) Subsection (d) does not:
(1) prohibit a landlord from interrupting, shutting off, or
terminating one (1) or more essential services to a rental unit
as needed:
(A) in an emergency;
(B) to make good faith repairs; or
(C) for construction; or
(2) require a landlord to pay for one (1) or more essential
services provided to a rental unit if the landlord has not
agreed to do so under the rental agreement.
SECTION 3. IC 32-31-8-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) This section applies to an action that is filed
under section 6 of this chapter after June 30, 2026.
(b) During the pendency of an action to which this section
applies, if the tenant continues to occupy the rental unit upon
which the action is based, the court may issue a provisional order
that requires the tenant to make regular rental payments otherwise
due to the landlord under the rental agreement to:
(1) the clerk of the court, who shall hold the payments in trust
for the parties; or
(2) an attorney trust account;
as directed by the court. The funds held by the clerk or in an
attorney trust account under this subsection may not be disbursed
unless the court issues an order for their disbursement.
(c) Subject to subsection (e), if the tenant is the prevailing party
in the action under section 6 of this chapter, the tenant is entitled
to a refund of payments made under an order issued by the court
under subsection (b). The amount of the refund:
(1) shall be determined by the court after taking into
consideration:
(A) the estimated cost of any repairs or other action
necessary to remedy the condition that was the basis of the
tenant's action under section 6 of this chapter;
(B) any expenses incurred by the tenant in undertaking any
repairs or other action necessary to remedy the condition
that was the basis of the tenant's action under section 6 of
this chapter;
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(C) any efforts undertaken by the landlord before or after
the filing of the tenant's action under section 6 of this
chapter to remedy the condition that was the basis of the
tenant's action under section 6 of this chapter; and
(D) any other factors that justice may require; and
(2) shall be disbursed to the tenant upon order of the court.
(d) Subject to subsection (e), if the tenant is not the prevailing
party in the action under section 6 of this chapter, the tenant is not
entitled to a refund of any rental payments made under an order
issued by the court under subsection (b), and any amounts held in
trust by the clerk of the court or in an attorney trust account shall,
upon order of the court, be disbursed to the landlord and credited
against the amount of the regular rental payments due to the
landlord under the rental agreement during the pendency of the
action.
(e) The court may reduce the amount of:
(1) a refund to be disbursed to a tenant in an order under
subsection (c), if the court determines that the tenant
contributed in any way to the necessity of repairs or other
action needed to remedy the condition that was the basis of
the tenant's action under section 6 of this chapter; or
(2) any amounts to be disbursed to a landlord in an order
under subsection (d), if the court determines that the
landlord's failure to comply with one (1) or more of the
requirements of this chapter contributed in any way to the
necessity of repairs or other action needed to remedy the
condition that was the basis of the tenant's action under
section 6 of this chapter;
as justice may require.
SECTION 4. IC 32-31-9-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.22-2007,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A landlord may not terminate a lease, refuse
to renew a lease, refuse to enter into a lease, or retaliate against a tenant
solely because:
(1) a tenant;
(2) an applicant; or
(3) an individual who is a member of the tenant's or applicant's
household;
is a protected individual.
(b) A landlord may not refuse to enter into a lease with an applicant
or retaliate against a tenant solely because:
(1) the tenant;
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(2) the applicant; or
(3) an individual who is a member of the tenant's or applicant's
household;
has terminated a rental agreement as a protected individual under
section 12 of this chapter.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), evidence that
a tenant engaged in a protected activity not more than six (6)
months before the landlord's alleged retaliatory conduct creates a
rebuttable presumption that the purpose of the landlord's conduct
was retaliation.
(d) A presumption does not arise under subsection (c) if the
tenant engaged in a protected activity after the landlord gave the
tenant notice of the landlord's intent to:
(1) increase the rent or fees;
(2) decrease services, increase the tenant's obligations, impose
different rules on, or selectively enforce the landlord's rules
against, the tenant or immediate family member, or otherwise
materially alter the terms of the lease;
(3) bring an action for possession on a ground other than
nonpayment of rent;
(4) refuse to renew a tenancy for a fixed term under a lease
containing a renewal option that is exercisable by the tenant
without negotiation with the landlord, for any period after the
lease would otherwise terminate; or
(5) terminate a periodic tenancy.
(e) A landlord may rebut a presumption under subsection (c) by
a preponderance of evidence showing that the landlord:
(1) had sufficient justification for engaging in the conduct that
created the presumption; and
(2) would have engaged in the conduct in the same manner
and at the same time whether or not the tenant engaged in a
protected activity.
SECTION 5. IC 36-1-20-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.193-2014,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This chapter does not prevent a political
subdivision from imposing and collecting a penalty for an act or
omission that is a nuisance or violation of the political subdivision's
enforceable ordinances or codes, subject to subsection (b).
(b) A penalty permitted under subsection (a) may not be imposed
until after:
(1) reasonable notice of the nuisance or violation has been given
to the owner or the owner's designee;
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129


(2) passage of a reasonable time, which must be stated in the
notice, for the nuisance or violation to be cured; and
(3) failure of the nuisance or violation to be cured within the time
stated in the notice.
(c) An owner or the owner's designee must pay all penalties
assessed by the political subdivision for violation of an obligation
under IC 32-31-8-5 with regard to a rental premises. All penalties
must be paid and all repairs required by the political subdivision
must be made before delivering the rental premises to a tenant.
2026 IN 127—LS 6497/DI 129